Utah statutes.
70A-3-503.   Notice of dishonor.
(1)  The obligation of an indorser stated in Subsection 70A-3-415 (1) and the
obligation of a drawer stated in Subsection 70A-3-414 (4) may not be enforced
unless the indorser or drawer is given notice of dishonor of the instrument
complying with this section or notice of dishonor is excused under Subsection
70A-3-504 (2).
(2)  Notice of dishonor may be given by any person, may be given by any
commercially reasonable means, including an oral, written, or electronic
communication, and is sufficient if it reasonably identifies the instrument
and indicates that the instrument has been dishonored or has not been paid or
accepted. Return of an instrument given to a bank for collection is sufficient
notice of dishonor.
(3)  Subject to Subsection 70A-3-504 (3), with respect to an instrument taken
for collection by a collecting bank, notice of dishonor must be given by the
bank before midnight of the next banking day following the banking day on
which the bank receives notice of dishonor of the instrument, or by any other
person within 30 days following the day on which the person receives notice of
dishonor.  With respect to any other instrument, notice of dishonor must be
given within 30 days following the day on which dishonor occurs.
